en: Lasagna with cooked vegetables and goat cheese
fr: Lasagnes aux légumes cuits et au fromage de chèvre
hr: Lazanje s kuhanim povrćem i kozjim sirom
lt: Lazanijos su ožkų sūriu ir keptomis daržovėmis

en: Meat lasagnas
nl: Vleeslasagnes, Vleeslasagna

en: Frozen lasagne
de: Tiefkühl-Lasagne
es: Lasaña congelada
fi: pakastelasagne
fr: Lasagnes surgelées
hr: Smrznute lazanje
it: Lasagne surgelate
lt: Šaldytos lazanijos
nl: Diepvrieslasagna
sv: Fryst lasagne

en: Bolognese lasagne
ca: Lasanya bolonyesa
de: Bologneselasagne
es: Lasaña boloñesa
fi: Lasagne bolognese
fr: Lasagnes à la bolognaise, Lasagnes bolognaise, Lasagne à la bolognaise
hr: Bolognese lazanje
it: Lasagne alla bolognese
lt: Bolonijos lazanija
nl: Kant-en-klaar bolognese lasagnas

en: Fish lasagnas, Lasagne with fish, Lasagna with fish
fr: Lasagnes au poisson
hr: Riblje lazanje
lt: Lazanijos su žuvimi
nl: Vislasagnes, Vislasagne

en: Salmon lasagne
fi: lohilasagne
fr: Lasagnes au saumon
hr: Lazanje od lososa
it: Lasagne al salmone
lt: Lazanijos su lašiša
nl: Zalmlasagnes, Zalmlasagne, Lasagne met zalm

en: Salmon and spinach lasagna
fr: Lasagnes au saumon et épinards
hr: Lazanje od lososa i špinata
lt: Lazanijos su lašiša ir špinatais

en: Tuna lasagna
es: Lasaña de atún
fr: Lasagnes au thon
hr: Lazanje od tune
lt: Lazanijos su tunu
nl: Tonijnlasagnes, Tonijnlasagne

en: Braised European hake
fr: Merlu cuit à l'étouffée
hr: Pirjani europski oslić
lt: Troškintos europinės jūrų lydekos

en: Hake fillet
fr: Filet de merlu
hr: File oslića
lt: Jūrų lydekų filė

en: Frozen hake fillet
fr: Filet de merlu surgelé
hr: Smrznuti file oslića
lt: Šaldyta jūrų lydekų filė

en: Hake, European hake
fr: Merlu
hr: Oslić
ja: メルルーサ, ヘイク
lt: Jūrų lydekos, Europinės jūrų lydekos

en: Shallow-water Cape hake
fr: Merlu blanc du Cap surgelé

en: Blue grenadier
fr: Grenadier bleu, Hoki de Nouvelle-Zélande
hr: Plavi grenadir
ja: ホキ

en: Pond smelt
fr: Éperlan
hr: Barski miris
ja: イシカリワカサギ
lt: Stintos

en: Garfish
fr: Orphie commune
hr: Garfish
ja: ガーフィッシュ

en: European sprat
fr: Sprat
hr: Europska papalina
lt: Šprotai

en: Prepared vegetables
ca: Verdures preparades
de: Vorbereitetes Gemüse, Gemüsezubereitung
es: Preparados vegetales
fi: kypsennetyt kasvikset
fr: Légumes préparés, légume préparé
he: ירקות מבושלים, ירקות מוכנים
hr: Pripremljeno povrće
hu: Előkészített zöldségek
it: Verdure pronte
lt: Paruoštos daržovės
nl: Kant-en-klaar groenten
pt: Legumes preparados
ru: Приготовленные овощи

en: Cooked vegetables
fr: Légumes cuits
hr: Kuhano povrće
lt: Keptos daržovės
nl: Gekookte groenten

en: Prepared sweet potatoes
nl: Geprepareerde zoete aardappelen